North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 14A. Coastal and Estuarine Commercial Fishing Licenses.
§ 113-170.2.
Fraud or deception as to licenses, permits, or records.

It is unlawful for any person to give any false information or willfully to omit giving required information to the Division or any license agent when the information is material to the securing of any license or permit under this Article. It is unlawful to falsify, fraudulently alter, or counterfeit any license, permit, identification, or record to which this Article applies or otherwise practice any fraud or deception designed to evade the provisions of this Article or reasonable administrative directives made under the authority of this Article.

A violation of this section is punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History.

1997-400, s. 5.1; 2001-213, s. 2.

§ 113-170.3.
Record-keeping requirements.

The Commission may require all licensees under this Article to keep and to exhibit upon the request of an authorized agent of the Department records and accounts as may be necessary to the equitable and efficient administration and enforcement of this Article. In addition, licensees may be required to keep additional information of a statistical nature or relating to location of catch as may be needed to determine conservation policy. Records and accounts required to be kept must be preserved for inspection for not less than three years.

It is unlawful for any licensee to refuse or to neglect without justifiable excuse to keep records and accounts as may be reasonably required. The Department may distribute forms to licensees to aid in securing compliance with its requirements, or it may inform licensees of requirements in other effective ways such as distributing memoranda and sending agents of the Department to consult with licensees who have been remiss. Detailed forms or descriptions of records, accounts, collection and inspection procedures, and the like that reasonably implement the objectives of this Article need not be embodied in rules of the Commission in order to be validly required.

The following records collected and compiled by the Department shall not be considered public records within the meaning of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes, but shall be confidential and shall be used only for the equitable and efficient administration and enforcement of this Article or for determining conservation policy, and shall not be disclosed except when required by the order of a court of competent jurisdiction: all records, accounts, and reports that licensees are required by the Commission to make, keep, and exhibit pursuant to the provisions of this section, and all records, accounts, and memoranda compiled by the Department from records, accounts, and reports of licensees and from investigations and inspections, containing data and information concerning the business and operations of licensees reflecting their assets, liabilities, inventories, revenues, and profits; the number, capacity, capability, and type of fishing vessels owned and operated; the type and quantity of fishing gear used; the catch of fish or other seafood by species in numbers, size, weight, quality, and value; the areas in which fishing was engaged in; the location of catch; the time of fishing, number of hauls, and the disposition of the fish and other seafood. The Department may compile statistical information in any aggregate or summary form that does not directly or indirectly disclose the identity of any licensee who is a source of the information, and any compilation of statistical information by the Department shall be a public record open to inspection and examination by any person, and may be disseminated to the public by the Department.

History.

1997-400, s. 5.1; 2001-213, s. 2.

§ 113-170.4.
Rules as to possession, transportation, and disposition of fisheries resources.

The Commission may adopt rules governing possession, transportation, and disposition of fisheries resources by all persons, including those not subject to fish dealer licensing requirements, in order that inspectors may adequately distinguish regulated coastal fisheries resources from those not so regulated and enforce the provisions of this Article equitably and efficiently. These rules may include requirements as to giving notice, filing declarations, securing permits, marking packages, and the like.

History.

1997-400, s. 5.1; 2001-213, s. 2.

§ 113-170.5.
Violations with respect to coastal fisheries resources.

It is unlawful to take, possess, transport, process, sell, buy, or in any way deal in coastal fisheries resources without conforming with the provisions of this Article or of rules adopted under the authority of this Article.

History.

1997-400, s. 5.1; 2001-213, s. 2.

§ 113-171.
Suspension, revocation, and reissuance of licenses.

Upon receipt of reliable notice that a person licensed under this Article, Article 14B, or Article 25A of Chapter 113 of the General Statutes to take resources under the jurisdiction of the Marine Fisheries Commission has had imposed against the person a conviction of a criminal offense within the jurisdiction of the Department under the provisions of this Subchapter or of rules of the Commission adopted under the authority of this Subchapter, the Secretary must suspend, revoke, and reissue all licenses held by the person in accordance with the terms of this section and rules adopted by the Commission. Reliable notice includes information furnished the Secretary in prosecution or other reports from inspectors. As used in this section, a conviction includes a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, any other termination of a criminal prosecution unfavorably to the defendant after jeopardy has attached, or any substitute for criminal prosecution whereby the defendant expressly or impliedly confesses the defendant’s guilt. In particular, procedures whereby bond forfeitures are accepted in lieu of proceeding to trial and cases indefinitely continued upon arrest of judgment or prayer for judgment continued are deemed convictions. The Secretary may act to suspend or revoke licenses upon the basis of any conviction in which:

No notice of appeal has been given;

The time for appeal has expired without an appeal having been perfected; or

The conviction is sustained on appeal. Where there is a new trial, finality of any subsequent conviction will be determined in the manner set out above.

The Secretary must initiate an administrative procedure designed to give the Secretary systematic notice of all convictions of criminal offenses by licensees covered by subsection (a) of this section above and keep a file of all convictions reported.

, (d) Repealed by Session Laws 2010-145, s. 2, effective October 1, 2012.

(e)

A licensee served with a notice of suspension or revocation may obtain an administrative review of the suspension or revocation by filing a petition for a contested case under

G.S. 150B-23

within 20 days after receiving the notice. The only issue in the hearing shall be whether the licensee was convicted of a criminal offense for which a license must be suspended or revoked. A license remains suspended or revoked pending the final decision.

(f)

If the Secretary refuses to reissue the license of or issue an additional license to an applicant whose license was revoked, the applicant may contest the decision by filing a petition for a contested case under

G.S. 150B-23

within 20 days after the Secretary makes the decision. The Commission shall make the final agency decision in a contested case under this subsection. An applicant whose license is denied under this subsection may not reapply for the same license for at least six months.

(g)

The Commission may adopt rules to provide for the disclosure of the identity of any individual or individuals in responsible positions of control respecting operations of any licensee that is not an individual. For the purposes of this section, individuals in responsible positions of control are deemed to be individual licensees and subject to suspension and revocation requirements in regard to any applications for license they may make — either as individuals or as persons in responsible positions of control in any corporation, partnership, or association. In the case of individual licensees, the individual applying for a license or licensed under this Article, Article 14B, or Article 25A of Chapter 113 of the General Statutes to take resources under the jurisdiction of the Marine Fisheries Commission must be the real party in interest.

(h)

In determining whether a conviction is a second or subsequent offense under the provisions of this section, the Secretary may not consider convictions for:

Offenses that occurred three years prior to the effective date of this Article; or

Offenses that occurred more than three years prior to the time of the latest offense the conviction for which is in issue as a subsequent conviction.

History.

1997-400, s. 5.1; 2001-213, s. 2; 2010-145, s. 2; 2011-398, s. 34.

§ 113-171.1.
Use of spotter planes in commercial fishing operations regulated.

Spotter Plane Defined. — A “spotter plane” is an aircraft used for aerial identification of the location of fish in coastal fishing waters so that a vessel may be directed to the fish.

License. — Before an aircraft is used as a spotter plane in a commercial fishing operation, the owner or operator of the aircraft must obtain a license for the aircraft from the Division. The fee for a license for a spotter plane is one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00). An applicant for a license for a spotter plane shall include in the application the identity, either by boat or by company, of the specific commercial fishing operations in which the spotter plane will be used during the license year. If, during the course of the license year, the aircraft is used as a spotter plane in a commercial fishing operation that is not identified in the original license application, the owner or operator of the aircraft shall amend the license application to add the identity of the additional commercial fishing operation.

Unlawful Activity. — It shall be unlawful to:

Use a spotter plane directed at food fish, except in connection with a purse seine operation authorized by a rule of the Commission.

Use or permit the use of an unlicensed spotter plane or a licensed spotter plane whose license application does not identify the specific commercial fishing operation involved.

Participate knowingly in a commercial fishing operation that uses an unlicensed spotter plane or a licensed spotter plane whose license application does not identify the specific commercial fishing operation involved.

Violation a Misdemeanor. — A violation of subsection (c) of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1997-400, s. 5.1; 2001-213, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 14.8(l).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.8(
l
), effective August 1, 2013, substituted “one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” in subsection (b).

§ 113-172.
License agents.

The Secretary shall designate license agents for the Department. The Division and license agents designated by the Secretary under this section shall issue licenses authorized under this Article in accordance with this Article and the rules of the Commission. The Secretary may require license agents to enter into a contract that provides for their duties and compensation, post a bond, and submit to reasonable inspections and audits. If a license agent violates any provision of this Article, the rules of the Commission, or the terms of the contract, the Secretary may initiate proceedings for the forfeiture of the license agent’s bond and may summarily suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a designation as a license agent and may impound or require the return of all licenses, moneys, record books, reports, license forms and other documents, ledgers, and materials pertinent or apparently pertinent to the license agency. The Secretary shall report evidence or misuse of State property, including license fees, by a license agent to the State Bureau of Investigation as provided by G.S. 143B-920.

License agents shall be compensated by adding a surcharge of one dollar ($1.00) to each license sold and retaining the surcharge. If more than one license is listed on a consolidated license form, the license agent shall be compensated as if a single license were sold. It is unlawful for a license agent to add more than the surcharge authorized by this section to the fee for each license sold.

History.

1997-400, s. 5.1; 1999-209, s. 3; 2001-213, s. 2; 2013-384, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 17.1(qq).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-384, s. 1, effective August 23, 2013, deleted the former second and third sentences of subsection (a), which read “At least one license agent shall be designated for each county that contains or borders on coastal fishing waters. The Secretary may designate additional license agents in any county if the Secretary determines that additional agents are needed to provide efficient service to the public.”

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 17.1(qq), effective July 1, 2014, substituted “G.S. 143B-920” for “G.S. 114-15.1” at the end of the last sentence of subsection (a).

§ 113-173.
Recreational Commercial Gear License.

License Required. — Except as provided in subsection (j) of this section, it is unlawful for any person to take or attempt to take fish for recreational purposes by means of commercial fishing equipment or gear in coastal fishing waters without holding a RCGL. As used in this section, fish are taken for recreational purposes if the fish are not taken for the purpose of sale. The RCGL entitles the licensee to use authorized commercial gear to take fish for personal use subject to recreational possession limits. It is unlawful for any person licensed under this section or fishing under a RCGL to possess fish in excess of recreational possession limits.

Sale of Fish Prohibited. — It is unlawful for the holder of a RCGL or for a person who is exempt under subsection (j) of this section to sell fish taken under the RCGL or pursuant to the exemption.

Authorized Commercial Gear. —

The Commission shall adopt rules authorizing the use of a limited amount of commercial fishing equipment or gear for recreational fishing under a RCGL. The Commission may authorize the limited use of commercial gear on a uniform basis in all coastal fishing waters or may vary the limited use of commercial gear within specified areas of the coastal fishing waters. The Commission shall periodically evaluate and revise the authorized use of commercial gear for recreational fishing. Authorized commercial gear shall be identified by visible colored tags or other means specified by the Commission in order to distinguish between commercial gear used in a commercial operation and commercial gear used for recreational purposes.

A person who holds a RCGL may use up to 100 yards of gill net to take fish for recreational purposes. Two persons who each hold a RCGL and who are fishing from a single vessel may use up to a combined 200 yards of gill net to take fish for recreational purposes. No more than 200 yards of gill net may be used to take fish for recreational purposes from a single vessel regardless of the number of persons aboard the vessel who hold a RCGL.

Purchase; Renewal. — A RCGL may be purchased at designated offices of the Division and from a license agent authorized under

G.S. 113-172

. A RCGL may be renewed by mail.

Replacement RCGL. — The provisions of

G.S. 113-168.1(h)

apply to this section.

Duration; Fees. — The RCGL shall be valid from the date of issue for a period of 12 months as defined by

G.S. 113-270.1

B(b) and

G.S. 113-270.1

B(c). The fee for a RCGL for a North Carolina resident shall be seventy dollars ($70.00). The fee for a RCGL for an individual who is not a North Carolina resident shall be five hundred dollars ($500.00).

RCGL Available for Inspection. — It is unlawful for any person to engage in recreational fishing by means of restricted commercial gear in the State without having ready at hand for inspection a valid RCGL. A holder of a RCGL shall not refuse to exhibit the RCGL upon the request of an inspector or any other law enforcement officer authorized to enforce federal or State laws, regulations, or rules relating to marine fisheries.

Assignment and Transfer Prohibited. — A RCGL is not transferable. Except as provided in subsection (j) of this section, it is unlawful to buy, sell, lend, borrow, assign, or otherwise transfer a RCGL, or to attempt to buy, sell, lend, borrow, assign, or otherwise transfer a RCGL.

Reporting Requirements. — The holder of a RCGL shall comply with the biological data sampling and survey programs of the Commission and the Division.

Exemptions. —

A person who is under 16 years of age may take fish for recreational purposes by means of authorized commercial gear without holding a RCGL if the person is accompanied by a parent, grandparent, or guardian who holds a valid RCGL or if the person has in the person’s possession a valid RCGL issued to the person’s parent, grandparent, or guardian.

A person may take crabs for recreational purposes by means of one or more crab pots attached to the shore along privately owned land or to a privately owned pier without holding a RCGL provided that the crab pots are attached with the permission of the owner of the land or pier.

A person who is on a vessel may take fish for recreational purposes by means of authorized commercial gear without holding a RCGL if there is another person on the vessel who holds a valid RCGL. This exemption does not authorize the use of commercial gear in excess of that authorized for use by the person who holds the valid RCGL or, if more than one person on the vessel holds a RCGL, in excess of that authorized for use by those persons.

A person using nonmechanical means may take shellfish for personal use within the limits specified in G.S. 113-169.2(i) without holding a RCGL.

A person may take fish for recreational purposes by means of a gig without holding a RCGL.

History.

1997-400, s. 5.1; 1997-456, s. 55.7; 1998-225, s. 4.21; 1999-209, s. 9; 2000-139, s. 1; 2001-213, s. 2; 2003-340, s. 1.2; 2004-187, s. 4; 2005-455, s. 1.18; 2013-360, s. 14.8(m); 2014-100, ss. 14.9(g), 14.25(c).

§ 113-173.1.
North Carolina Commercial Fishing Resource Fund.

Establishment. — There is hereby established the North Carolina Commercial Fishing Resources Fund (Fund) as a nonreverting special revenue fund in the office of the State Treasurer. The purpose of the Fund is to provide funding for the development of sustainable commercial fishing in the State. The principal of the Fund shall consist of all of the following:

Two hundred dollars ($200.00) from each Standard Commercial Fishing License issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-168.2

.

One hundred dollars ($100.00) from each Retired Standard Commercial Fishing License issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-168.3

.

Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) from each shellfish license issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-169.2

.

Fifty dollars ($50.00) from each fish dealer license issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-169.3

.

Two hundred dollars ($200.00) from each land or sell license issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-169.5

.

Thirty-five dollars ($35.00) from each Recreational Commercial Gear License issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-173

.The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separate and apart from all other moneys, funds, and accounts. The State Treasurer shall invest the assets of the Fund in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.2

, except that interest and other income received on the fund balance shall be treated as set forth in G.S. 147-69.1(d).

Use of Funds. — The North Carolina Commercial Fishing Resource Fund created by this section shall be used only for the following purposes, in order of priority:

First, the Fund shall fully fund the State’s incidental take permits for the commercial fishing industry under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-205) or the federal Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972 (Public Law 92-522).

After the priority set forth in subdivision (1) of this section has been fully funded, the Fund may be used for other projects to develop and support sustainable commercial fishing in the State.

Procedure for Fund Disbursements. — With respect to funds used pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the State Treasurer shall disburse the principal of the Fund only upon the written direction of the Director of the Division. With respect to funds used pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the State Treasurer shall disburse the principal of the Fund only upon the written direction of both the Marine Fisheries Commission and the Funding Committee established by subsection (d) of this section following the procedures set forth in the memorandum of understanding developed under subsection (f) of this section. In the event of a disagreement between the Commission and the Committee, the Secretary of Environmental Quality shall decide between the directions proposed by the Commission and by the Committee.

Funding Committee. — The Funding Committee for the North Carolina Commercial Fishing Resource Fund (Committee) is established and shall consist of six members who shall serve staggered terms. Each of the following commercial fishing organizations shall appoint one member for an initial term as indicated and provide notice of that appointment in the manner set forth in

G.S. 143-47.6

:

North Carolina Fisheries Association, Inc., for a term of three years.

North Carolina Watermen United, Inc., for a term of two years.

Ocracoke Working Watermen’s Association, for a term of one year.

Brunswick County Fishermen’s Association, for a term of three years.

Carteret County Fishermen’s Association, for a term of two years.

Albemarle Fishermen’s Association, for a term of one year.Upon the expiration of the terms of the initial Committee members, each member shall be appointed by the appointing organizations designated in subdivisions (1) through (6) of this subsection for a three-year term and shall serve until a successor is appointed and qualified. Members may be reappointed, but no member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. The Committee shall elect annually a chair and other officers as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, who shall serve a term of one year corresponding to the calendar year.

Vacancies, Meetings, Quorum. — Vacancies in the Committee shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. The Committee may meet at any time upon the call of the chair. A quorum of the group shall consist of four members.

Memorandum of Understanding. — The Marine Fisheries Commission and the Committee shall develop and implement a memorandum of understanding setting forth the procedures for agreeing to and authorizing the disbursements from the Fund created in this section for the purposes described by subdivision (b)(2) of this section.

Ethics. — Members of the Committee are public servants as defined in sub-subdivision i. of subdivision (70) of

G.S. 138A-3

.

History.

2014-100, s. 14.9(i); 2015-241, s. 14.30(y); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “sub-subdivision i. of subdivision (70) of G.S. 163A-152” for “sub-subdivision i. of subdivision (30) of

G.S. 138A-3

” in subsection (g).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the change to the reference in subsection (g).